zh-CN: 音板材料: 桦木; 碳纤维/复合材料; 雪松; 欧洲云杉; 枫木; 西加云杉; 云杉; 其他
zh-TW: 響板材質: 樺木; 碳纖維/複合材質; 雪松木; 歐洲雲杉木; 楓木; 西特卡雲杉木; 雲杉木; 其他
es: Material de la caja de resonancia: Abedul; Fibra de carbono o compuesto; Cedro; Abeto europeo; Arce; Abeto de Sitka; Abeto; Otro
de: Resonanzbodenmaterial: Birke; Karbonfaser/Verbundwerkstoff; Zeder; Europäische Fichte; Ahorn; Sitka-Fichte; Fichte; Andere
ro-RO: Material al plăcii de rezonanță: Mesteacăn; Fibră de carbon/compozit; Cedru; Molid european; Arțar; Molid de Sitka; Molid; Altele
pl: Materiał płyty rezonansowej: Brzoza; Włókno węglowe / kompozyt; Cedr; Świerk europejski; Klon; Świerk Sitka; Świerk; Inne
ko: 사운드보드 재질: 자작나무; 탄소 섬유/복합재; 삼나무; 유럽산 가문비나무; 단풍나무; 시트카 가문비나무; 가문비나무; 기타
pt-PT: Material da placa de ressonância: Bétula; Fibra de carbono/compósito; Cedro; Abeto europeu; Bordo; Abeto Sitka; Abeto; Outro
da: Materiale i klangbund: Birk; Kulfiber/komposit; Ceder; Europæisk gran; Ahorn; Sitkagran; Gran; Andet
pt-BR: Tampo harmônico material: Bétula; Fibra de carbono/material composto; Cedro; Abeto europeu; Bordo; Abeto de Sitka; Abeto; Outro
bg-BG: Материал на резонаторната дъска: Бреза; Въглеродни влакна/композит; Кедър; Европейски смърч; Клен; Ситкански смърч; Смърч; Друго
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำแผ่นเสียงของพิณ: ไม้เบิร์ช; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์/คอมโพสิต; ไม้ซีดาร์; ไม้ยูโรเปียนสปรูซ; ไม้เมเปิล; ไม้ซิทกาสปรูซ; ไม้สปรูซ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Materiál rezonančnej dosky: Breza; Uhlíkové vlákno/kompozit; Céder; Európsky smrek; Javor; Smrek sitkanský; Smrek; Iné
hr-HR: Materijal zvučne ploče: Breza; Ugljična vlakna / kompozit; Cedar; Europska smreka; Javor; Sitka smreka; Smreka; Ostalo
hu: Keverőpult anyaga: Nyírfa; Szénszál/kompozit; Cédrus; Európai lucfenyő; Juhar; Sitka lucfenyő; Lucfenyő; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu bảng âm thanh: Gỗ bạch dương; Sợi carbon/composite; Gỗ tuyết tùng; Gỗ vân sam châu Âu; Gỗ phong; Gỗ vân sam Sitka; Gỗ vân sam; Khác
en: Soundboard material: Birch; Carbon fiber/composite; Cedar; European spruce; Maple; Sitka spruce; Spruce; Other
nb: Materiale for lydplate: Bjørk; Karbonfiber/kompositt; Seder; Europeisk gran; Lønn; Sitkagran; Gran; Annet
ru: Материал деки: Берёза; Углеродное волокно/композит; Кедр; Европейская ель; Клён; Ситхинская ель; Ель; Другое
nl: Klankbord materiaal: Berken; Koolstofvezel/composiet; Ceder; Europees vuren; Esdoorn; Sitka-vuren; Vuren; Anders
fi: Soundboardin materiaali: Koivu; Hiilikuitu/komposiitti; Setripuu; Eurooppalainen kuusi; Vaahtera; Sitkankuusi; Kuusi; Muu
cs: Materiál rezonanční desky: Bříza; Uhlíkové vlákno / kompozit; Cedr; Evropský smrk; Javor; Smrk sitka; Smrk; Jiné
ja: サウンドボード素材: バーチ; カーボンファイバー / 複合材; シダー; ヨーロピアンスプルース; メープル; シトカスプルース; スプルース; その他
sl-SI: Material rezonančne plošče: Breza; Ogljikova vlakna/kompozit; Cedra; Evropska smreka; Javor; Sitkanska smreka; Smreka; Drugo
fr: Matériau de la table d’harmonie: Bouleau; Fibre de carbone/composite; Cèdre; Épicéa européen; Érable; Épicéa de Sitka; Épicéa; Autre
lt-LT: Rezonansinės plokštės medžiaga: Beržas; Anglies pluoštas / kompozitas; Kedras; Europinė eglė; Klevas; Sitkinė eglė; Eglė; Kita
it: Materiale per la tavola armonica: Betulla; Fibra di carbonio/composito; Cedro; Abete rosso europeo; Acero; Abete rosso Sitka; Abete rosso; Altro
sv: Material för resonansplatta: Björk; Kolfiber/komposit; Ceder; Europeisk gran; Lönn; Sitkagran; Gran; Övrigt
el: Υλικό κονσόλας ήχου: Σημύδα; Ανθρακόνημα/σύνθετο υλικό; Κέδρος; Ευρωπαϊκό έλατο; Σφένδαμος; Έλατο Σίτκα; Έλατο; Άλλο
tr: Ses tahtası malzemesi: Huş; Karbon fiber/kompozit; Sedir; Avrupa ladini; Akçaağaç; Sitka ladini; Ladin; Diğer